Florida, session 2026, HB347.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 256.18, Florida Statutes, is created to
read:
256.18 Governmental entities; display of flags.—
(1) As used in this section, the term "governmental
entity" means a state, county, municipality, special district,
or other political subdivision, whether executive, judicial, or
legislative, including, but not limited to, a department,
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb347-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 347 2026
division, board, bureau, commission, authority, or district, or
an agency thereof, or a public school, Florida College System
institution, state university, or associated board.
(2)(a) A governmental entity may not:
1. Display any flag on real property other than a flag
listed in subsection (3).
2. Place or cause to be placed a flag authorized to be
displayed under subsection (3) which contains or depicts any
word, figure, mark, picture, design, drawing, symbol, or
advertisement of any nature which represents political
partisanship, political ideology, race, gender, or sexual
orientation.
(b) A governmental entity that violates this subsection is
liable for a civil fine in the amount of $500 per day. Proceeds
from fines collected by the Department of State shall be
deposited into the General Revenue Fund.
(3) A governmental entity may display on real property:
(a) The flag of the United States.
(b) The state flag.
(c) The flag of another state or another country.
(d) The flag of a city, county, municipality, or other
political subdivision of this state.
(e) The flag of a branch of the United States Armed
Forces.
(f) A POW-MIA flag pursuant to this chapter.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb347-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 347 2026
(g) The flag of an Indian tribe recognized by the United
States.
(h) The official flag of a public school, Florida College
System institution, or state university.
(i) A flag of historical significance to the government of
the United States or this state.
(j) The official flag of the United States Paralympic
Committee, the International Olympic Committee, or the
International Paralympic Committee.
(k) The Olympic flag or Paralympic flag representing games
that have occurred or will occur in this state.
(l) The flag of any sporting organization that is hosting,
has hosted, or will host a sporting event in this state.
(4) A governmental entity that displays the United States
flag must display the flag in a prominent position that is
superior to any other flag on display.
Section 2. Section 256.19, Florida Statutes, is created to
read:
256.19 Local government flags; prohibited acts.—
(1) As used in this section, the term "local government"
means a city, county, municipality, or other political
subdivision of this state.
(2) A local government may not adopt an ordinance or
regulation that authorizes the flag of the local government to
contain or depict any word, figure, mark, picture, design,
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb347-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 347 2026
drawing, symbol, or advertisement of any nature which represents
political partisanship, political ideology, race, gender, or
sexual orientation.
(3) Any existing or future ordinance or regulation adopted
by a local government which is in conflict with subsection (2)
is void.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb347-00